fr: Format de vente du tissu Evenweave: Au demi-mètre; Au demi-yard; Au mètre; Au yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Pièce prédécoupée; Autre
pt-BR: Formato da embalagem do tecido de trama uniforme: Por meio metro; Por meia jarda; Por metro; Por jarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Peça pré-cortada; Outros
nb: Evenweave-stoffpakkeformat: Per halve meter; Per halve yard; Per meter; Per yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Ferdigklippet stykke; Annet
ro-RO: Formatul pachetului de țesătură cu ochiuri egale: La jumătate de metru; La jumătate de yard; La metru; La yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Bucată pretăiată; Altele
es: Formato de paquete de tela uniforme: Por medio metro; Por media yarda; Por metro; Por yarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Pieza precortada; Otro
el: Μορφή συσκευασίας υφάσματος evenweave: Ανά μισό μέτρο; Ανά μισή γιάρδα; Ανά μέτρο; Ανά γιάρδα; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Προκομμένο κομμάτι; Άλλο
zh-CN: 机织面料包装形式: 按半米; 按半码; 按米; 按码; 胖 1/8 码; 胖 1/4 码; 预裁剪件; 其他
sv: Paketformat för evenweave-tyg: Per halvmeter; Per halv yard; Per meter; Per yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Färdigklippt bit; Övrigt
ja: イーブンウィーブ生地のパッケージ形式: 0.5メートル単位; 0.5ヤード単位; 1メートル単位; 1ヤード単位; ファットエイス; ファットクォーター; プレカット生地; その他
lt-LT: Evenweave audinio pakuotės formatas: Pusmetriais; Pusjardžiais; Metrais; Jardais; 1/8 jardo atraiža („Fat eighth“); 1/4 jardo atraiža („Fat quarter“); Iš anksto atkirptas gabalas; Kita
nl: Evenweave stof verpakkingsvorm: Per halve meter; Per halve yard; Per meter; Per yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Voorgesneden stuk; Overig
de: Verpackungsformat von Evenweave-Stoff: Pro halben Meter; Pro halbes Yard; Pro Meter; Pro Yard; Fat Eighth; Fat Quarter; Vorgeschnittenes Stück; Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบบรรจุภัณฑ์ของผ้า Evenweave: ทีละครึ่งเมตร; ทีละครึ่งหลา; ทีละเมตร; ทีละหลา; แฟตเอธ; แฟตควอเตอร์; ชิ้นที่ตัดไว้แล้ว; อื่นๆ
fi: Tasakudoksisen kankaan myyntimuoto: Puolen metrin paloina; Puolen jaardin paloina; Metreittäin; Jaardeittain; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Valmiiksi leikattu pala; Muu
zh-TW: Evenweave 布料包裝形式: 依半公尺計; 依半碼計; 依公尺計; 依碼計; 胖八分之一碼; 胖四分之一碼; 預先裁切塊; 其他
ru: Формат продажи ткани с равномерным переплетением: По полметра; По полъярда; По метру; По ярду; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Готовый отрез; Другое
hr-HR: Format pakiranja tkanine Evenweave: Na pola metra; Na pola jarda; Na metar; Na jard; Fat eighth (1/8 jarda tkanine); Četvrtina jarda (fat quarter); Unaprijed odrezani komad; Ostalo
sk-SK: Formát balenia rovnomerne tkanej látky Evenweave: Na pol metre; Na pol yardy; Na metre; Na yardy; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Predstrihnutý kus; Iné
vi: Định dạng bao bì vải Evenweave: Theo nửa mét; Theo nửa yard; Theo mét; Theo yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Mảnh cắt sẵn; Khác
en: Evenweave fabric package format: By the half meter; By the half yard; By the meter; By the yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Pre-cut piece; Other
da: Evenweave-stofpakkeformat: Pr. halve meter; Pr. halve yard; Pr. meter; Pr. yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Forudskåret stykke; Andet
hu: Egyenletes szövésű szövet csomagolási formátum: Félméterenként; Fél yardonként; Méterenként; Yardonként; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Előre vágott darab; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika pakiranja blaga z enakomernim tkanjem: Na pol metra; Na pol jarda; Na meter; Na jard; Debela osmina (fat eighth); Debela četrtina (fat quarter); Vnaprej odrezan kos; Drugo
pt-PT: Formato da embalagem do tecido Evenweave: Por meio metro; Por meia jarda; Por metro; Por jarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Peça pré-cortada; Outro
it: Formato confezione del tessuto Evenweave: A mezzo metro; A mezza iarda; Al metro; Alla iarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Pezzo pretagliato; Altro
ko: 균일직 원단 포장 형태: 0.5미터 단위; 0.5야드 단위; 미터 단위; 야드 단위; 팻 에이스; 팻 쿼터; 사전 재단 조각; 기타
bg-BG: Формат на опаковката на панама: На половин метър; На половин ярд; На метър; На ярд; Дебела осминка; Дебела четвъртинка; Предварително отрязано парче; Други
tr: Evenweave kumaş paket formatı: Yarım metrelik; Yarım yardalık; Metrelik; Yardalık; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Önceden kesilmiş parça; Diğer
pl: Format opakowania tkaniny typu evenweave: Na pół metra; Na pół jarda; Na metry; Na jardy; Tzw. tłusta ósemka (fat eighth); Tzw. tłusta ćwiartka (fat quarter); Kawałek docięty fabrycznie; Inny
cs: Formát balení látky Evenweave: Na půlmetry; Na půlyardy; Na metry; Na yardy; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Předem nastříhaný kus; Jiné